Illinois, session 104th, SB585.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interstate Mutual Emergency Aid Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 235/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Interstate Mutual Emergency Aid Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-309, eff. 8-12-13.)